paice-husk-sbl-generator/paicehusk.sbl
	define rec as(
		canContinue and 
		(
		( ( 'ia' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['ia'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'a' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['a'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'bb' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['b'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ytic' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['tic'] delete) (insert 's' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ic' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ic'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'nc' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['c'] delete) (insert 't' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'dd' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['d'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ied' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ied'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ceed' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ed'] delete) (insert 'ss' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'eed' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['d'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ed' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ed'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'hood' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['hood'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'e' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['e'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'lief' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['f'] delete) (insert 'v' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'if' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['if'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ing' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ing'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iag' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iag'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ag' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ag'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'gg' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['g'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'th' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['th'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'guish' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['guish'] delete) (insert 'ct' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ish' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ish'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'i' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['i'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'i' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['i'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ij' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 'd' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'fuj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 's' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'uj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 'd' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'oj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 'd' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'hej' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 'r' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'verj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 't' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'misj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['sj'] delete) (insert 't' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'nj' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 'd' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'j' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['j'] delete) (insert 's' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ifiabl' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ifiabl'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iabl' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iabl'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'abl' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['abl'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ibl' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ibl'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'bil' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['il'] delete) (insert 'l' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'cl' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['l'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iful' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iful'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ful' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ful'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ul' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ul'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ial' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ial'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ual' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ual'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'al' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['al'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'll' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['l'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ium' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ium'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'um' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['um'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ism' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ism'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'mm' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['m'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'sion' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['sion'] delete) (insert 'j' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'xion' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['xion'] delete) (insert 'ct' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ion' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ion'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ian' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ian'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'an' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['an'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'een' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'en' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['en'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'nn' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['n'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ship' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ship'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'pp' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['p'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'er' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['er'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ear' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ar' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ar'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'or' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['or'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ur' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ur'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'rr' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['r'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'tr' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['r'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ier' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ier'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ies' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ies'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'sis' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['is'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'is' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['is'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ness' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ness'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ss' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ous' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ous'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'us' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['us'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 's' (test check) ) and ( (isIntact) (unset isIntact) (['s'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 's' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'plicat' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['icat'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'at' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['at'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ment' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ment'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ent' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ent'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ant' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ant'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ript' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['pt'] delete) (insert 'b' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'orpt' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['pt'] delete) (insert 'b' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'duct' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['t'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'sumpt' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['pt'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'cept' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['pt'] delete) (insert 'iv' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'olut' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ut'] delete) (insert 'v' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'sist' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ist' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ist'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'tt' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['t'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iqu' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iqu'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ogu' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['u'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'siv' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['siv'] delete) (insert 'j' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'eiv' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'iv' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['iv'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'bly' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['y'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ily' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ily'] delete) (insert 'y' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ply' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) ([''] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ly' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ly'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ogy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['y'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'phy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['y'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'omy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['y'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'opy' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['y'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ity' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ity'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ety' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ety'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'lty' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ty'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'istry' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['istry'] delete) (insert '' ) (unset canContinue) ) )
		or
		( ( 'ary' (test check) ) and (  (unset isIntact) (['ary'] delete) (insert '' ) (set canContinue) ) )
		or
